Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.270

Sewerage sale acquired property—Disposition.

At any time after deed is issued to it pursuant to lien, a city or town may lease or sell or convey any property at public or private sale for such price and on such terms as may be determined by resolution of the city or town legislative body, any provision of law, charter or ordinance to the contrary notwithstanding.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.270. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-11.]